hr-HR: Certifikacija softballa: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Ostalo
de: Softballzertifizierung: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Andere
lt-LT: Softbolo sertifikatas: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Kita
el: Πιστοποίηση softball: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Άλλο
tr: Softbol sertifikasyonu: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Diğer
sv: Certifiering för softball: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Övrigt
nb: Softball-sertifisering: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Annet
pt-BR: Softbol, certificação da bola: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Outra
sl-SI: Certifikacija za softball: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Drugo
ro-RO: Certificare pentru softball: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Altele
hu: Softball tanúsítás: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Egyéb
en: Softball certification: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Other
cs: Certifikace na softbal: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Jiné
pt-PT: Certificação da bola de softbol: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Outra
ja: ソフトボール認証: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; その他
fi: Softball-pallon sertifiointi: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Muu
zh-TW: 壘球認證: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; 其他
sk-SK: Softbalová certifikácia: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Iná
ko: 소프트볼 인증: ASA/USA 소프트볼; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; 기타
nl: Softbalcertificering: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Anders
vi: Chứng nhận tiêu chuẩn của bóng mềm: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Khác
ru: Сертификация софтбола: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Другое
pl: Certyfikacja piłki do softballu: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Inny
zh-CN: 垒球认证: ASA/USA 垒球; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; 其他
da: Softballcertificering: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Andet
th: การรับรองลูกซอฟต์บอล: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Other
it: Certificazione softball: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Altra
es: Certificación de sóftbol: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Otro
bg-BG: Сертификация за софтбол: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Друго
fr: Certification de softball: ASA/USA Softball; ISA; ISC; ISF; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; SPA; USSSA; Autre